Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-618
Improvement districts; property included; types of improvements.

Any improvement district created pursuant to section 16-617 may include portions of different streets, alleys, sidewalks, public ways, or other public spaces or portions of each, which abut, intersect, or adjoin, and may include two or more types of improvements in a single district in one ordinance.

Laws 1917, c. 95, § 1, p. 254;

C.S.1922, § 4084;

Laws 1925, c. 50, § 1, p. 192;

C.S.1929, § 16-613;

Laws 1933, c. 27, § 1, p. 202;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-613;

R.S.1943, § 16-618;

Laws 1980, LB 654, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 85;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB90, § 3.